Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 1 MOTOR VEHICLE DEALERS
44-20-108. Classes of licenses.

The following classes of licenses are issued under this part 1:

Motor vehicle dealer's license shall permit the licensee to engage in the business of selling, exchanging, leasing, or offering new and used motor vehicles, and this form of license shall permit not more than two persons named therein who shall be owners or part owners of the business of the licensee to act as motor vehicle salespersons.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(b) is effective until January 1, 2023.] Used motor vehicle dealer's license shall permit the licensee to engage in the business of selling, exchanging, leasing, or offering used motor vehicles only. The license shall also permit a licensee to negotiate for a consumer the sale, exchange, or lease of used and new motor vehicles not owned by the licensee, except those vehicles defined in section 42-1-102 (55) as motorcycles and section 33-14.5-101 (3) as off-highway vehicles; however, prior to completion of the sale, exchange, or lease of a motor vehicle not owned by the licensee, the licensee shall disclose in writing to the consumer whether the licensee will receive any compensation from the consumer and whether the licensee will receive any compensation from the owner of the motor vehicle as a result of the transaction. If the licensee receives compensation from the owner of the motor vehicle as a result of the transaction, the licensee shall include in the written disclosure the name of the owner from whom the licensee will receive compensation. This form of license shall permit not more than two persons named therein who shall be owners or part owners of the business of the licensee to act as motor vehicle salespersons.

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(b) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

Used motor vehicle dealer's license, which permits the licensee to engage in the business of selling, exchanging, leasing, or offering used motor vehicles only. The license also permits a licensee to negotiate for a consumer the sale, exchange, or lease of used and new motor vehicles not owned by the licensee, except those vehicles defined in section 42-1-102 (7.5) and (55) as autocycles or motorcycles and section 33-14.5-101 (3) as off-highway vehicles; however, prior to completion of the sale, exchange, or lease of a motor vehicle not owned by the licensee, the licensee shall disclose in writing to the consumer whether the licensee will receive any compensation from the consumer and whether the licensee will receive any compensation from the owner of the motor vehicle as a result of the transaction. If the licensee receives compensation from the owner of the motor vehicle as a result of the transaction, the licensee shall include in the written disclosure the name of the owner from whom the licensee will receive compensation. This form of license permits not more than two persons named in the license, who shall be owners or part owners of the business of the licensee, to act as motor vehicle salespersons.

A motor vehicle salesperson's license permits the licensee to engage in the activities of a motor vehicle salesperson while employed by a licensed motor vehicle dealer or used motor vehicle dealer.

Manufacturer's or distributor's license shall permit the licensee to engage in the activities of a manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or distributor branch and to sell fire trucks.

A wholesaler's license permits the licensee to engage in the activities of a wholesaler, but does not permit more than two individuals, who must be named in the license and who must be owners or part owners of the business of the licensee, to perform the activities of a wholesaler.

Manufacturer representative's license shall permit the licensee to engage in the activities of a manufacturer representative.

Buyer agent's license shall permit the licensee to engage in the activities of a buyer agent.

Wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer's license shall permit a licensee to engage in the activities of a wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer if the licensee provides auction services solely in connection with wholesale transactions in which the purchasers are motor vehicle dealers licensed by this state or any other jurisdiction or in connection with the sale of government vehicles to consumers at a time and place that does not conflict with a wholesale motor vehicle auction conducted by that licensee. A wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer shall abide by all laws and rules of the state of Colorado.

A wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer shall maintain a check and title insurance policy for the benefit of the dealer's customers or, alternatively, a wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer shall provide written guarantees of title to the dealer's purchasing customers and written guarantees of payment to the dealer's selling dealers with coverage and exclusions that are customary in check and title insurance policies available to wholesale motor vehicle auction dealers.

If the sales value of all the motor vehicles sold does not exceed twenty percent of the business's gross revenue, the business disposal license permits a business to sell used motor vehicles that:

Have been owned for more than one year;

Have been used exclusively for business purposes;

Are titled in the name of the business;

For which all related taxes have been paid; and

Are not designed or used primarily to carry passengers, not including:

A vehicle designed primarily for transporting more than ten individuals; or

A truck having an enclosed cab and an open cargo area.

Any license issued by the executive director pursuant to law in effect prior to July 1, 1992, shall be valid for the period for which issued.

The licensing requirements of this part 1 do not apply to banks, savings banks, savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, or credit unions or an affiliate or subsidiary of the entities in offering to sell, or in the sale of, a motor vehicle that was subject to a lease or that has been repossessed or foreclosed upon if the repossession or foreclosure is in connection with a loan made or originated in Colorado.

The licensing requirements of this part 1 shall not apply to an insurance company selling or offering to sell a motor vehicle through a motor vehicle dealer or used motor vehicle dealer if the vehicle is obtained by the company as a result of an insurance claim.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 54, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(1)(e) amended, (HB 19-1286), ch. 425, p. 3715, § 1, effective August 2; (1)(i) added, (SB 19-249), ch. 309, p. 2802, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 22-1043), ch. 361, p. 2589, § 31, effective January 1, 2023.

44-20-109. Temporary motor vehicle dealer license.

If a licensed motor vehicle dealer has entered into a written agreement to sell a dealership to a purchaser and the purchaser has been awarded a new dealership franchise, the board may issue a temporary motor vehicle dealer's license to the purchaser or prospective purchaser. The director shall issue the temporary license only after the board has received the applications for both a temporary motor vehicle dealer's license and a motor vehicle dealer's license, the appropriate application fee for the motor vehicle dealer's application, evidence of a passing test score, and evidence that the franchise has been awarded to the applicant by the manufacturer.

A temporary motor vehicle dealer's license authorizes the licensee to act as a motor vehicle dealer. Temporary licensees are subject to this article 20 and to all applicable rules adopted by the executive director or the board. A temporary motor vehicle dealer's license is effective for up to sixty days or until the board acts on the licensee's application for a motor vehicle dealer's license, whichever is sooner.

For the purpose of enabling an out-of-state dealer to sell vehicles on a temporary basis during specifically identified events, the director may issue, upon direction by the board, a temporary motor vehicle dealer's license, which is effective for thirty days. The temporary licensee is subject to the rules adopted by the executive director or the board.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 55, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-108.5 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-110. Display, form, custody, and use of licenses.

The board and the executive director shall prescribe the form of the license to be issued by the executive director and shall imprint on each license the seal of their offices. The executive director shall mail the license to the business address where the motor vehicle salesperson is licensed. Each motor vehicle salesperson shall keep a copy of the license at the salesperson's place of employment for inspection by employers, consumers, the director, the executive director, or the board. Each motor vehicle dealer, manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, manufacturer representative, wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer, or used motor vehicle dealer shall display conspicuously each person's license at the place of business for which the license was issued.

Each license issued under this part 1 is separate and distinct. It is a violation of this part 1 for a person to exercise any of the privileges granted under a license that the person does not hold, or for a licensee to knowingly allow such an exercise of privileges.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 56, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-109 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-111. Fees - disposition - expenses - expiration of licenses.

Each application must be accompanied by the fee established in subsection (5) of this section for each of the following licenses:

Motor vehicle dealer's or used motor vehicle dealer's license;

Motor vehicle dealer's or used motor vehicle dealer's license, for each place of business in addition to the principal place of business;

Renewal or reissue of motor vehicle dealer's or used motor vehicle dealer's license after change in location or lapse in principal place of business;

Manufacturer's license;

Distributor's license;

Wholesaler's license;

Manufacturer representative's license;

Motor vehicle salesperson's license including, but not limited to, reissuing a license;

Buyer agent's license;

Wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer's license; or

Business disposal license.

All fees shall be paid to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fees to the auto dealers license fund created in section 44-20-133.

If an application for a buyer agent's, motor vehicle dealer's, used motor vehicle dealer's, wholesaler's, business disposer's, or motor vehicle salesperson's license is withdrawn by the applicant prior to issuance of the license, the director shall refund one-half of the license fee.

Licenses, if the same have not been suspended or revoked as provided in this part 1, shall be valid until one year following the month of issuance thereof and shall then expire; except that any license issued under this part 1 shall expire upon the voluntary surrender thereof or upon the abandonment of the licensee's place of business for a period of more than thirty days.

Thirty days before the expiration of a license, the director shall mail to the licensee's business address of record a notice stating when the person's license is due to expire and the fee necessary to renew the license. For a salesperson or manufacturer representative, the notice shall be mailed to the address of the dealer or manufacturer where the person is licensed.

Upon the expiration of the license, unless suspended or revoked, the same may be renewed upon the payment of the fees specified in this section that accompany applications, and the renewal may be made from year to year as a matter of right; except that, if a motor vehicle dealer, used motor vehicle dealer, business disposer, or wholesaler voluntarily surrenders its license or abandons its place of business for a period of more than thirty days, the licensee is required to file a new application to renew its license.

Notwithstanding subsection (4)(a) of this section, a person has a thirty-day grace period after his or her license expires, and the person may renew the license within thirty days pursuant to subsection (4)(c) of this section, so long as the person has a bond in full force and effect that complies with the applicable bonding requirements of section 44-20-112, 44-20-113, or 44-20-114 during the thirty-day period. A person applying during the thirty-day grace period shall pay a late fee established pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.

The board shall propose, as part of its annual budget request, an adjustment in the amount of each fee that the board is authorized by law to collect. The budget request and the adjusted fees for the board shall reflect direct and indirect costs.

Based upon the appropriation made and subject to the approval of the executive director, the board shall adjust the fees collected by the executive director so that the revenue generated from the fees covers the direct and indirect costs of administering this article 20. The fees shall remain in effect for the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made.

Whenever money appropriated to the board for its activities for the prior fiscal year is unexpended, the money shall be made a part of the appropriation to the board for the next fiscal year, and the amount shall not be raised from fees collected by the board or the executive director. If a supplemental appropriation is made to the board for its activities, the fees of the board and the executive director, when adjusted for the fiscal year next following that in which the supplemental appropriation was made, shall be adjusted by an additional amount that is sufficient to compensate for the supplemental appropriation. Money appropriated to the board in the annual general appropriation bill shall be from the fund provided in section 44-20-133.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 56, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

IP(1), (1)(h), (3), and (4)(c) amended and (1)(i) added, (SB 19-249), ch. 309, p. 2802, § 3, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-110 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-112. Bond of licensee.

Before any motor vehicle dealer's, wholesaler's, wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer's, business disposal, or used motor vehicle dealer's license is issued by the board through the executive director to an applicant, the applicant must procure and file with the board evidence of a savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101 or a good and sufficient bond with corporate surety duly licensed to do business within the state, approved as to form by the attorney general of the state, and conditioned that the applicant must not practice fraud or violate any provision of this part 1 related to fraud that is designated by the board by rule in conducting the business for which the applicant is licensed. A motor vehicle dealer, business disposer, or used motor vehicle dealer need not furnish an additional bond, savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit under this section if the dealer furnishes a bond, savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit under section 44-20-412.

The purpose of the bond procured by the applicant in accordance with subsection (1) of this section and section 44-20-114 (1) is to provide for the reimbursement for any loss or damage suffered by any retail consumer caused by fraud or a violation of this part 1 related to fraud by a motor vehicle dealer, used motor vehicle dealer, wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer, business disposer, or wholesaler. For a wholesale transaction, the bond is available to each party to the transaction; except that, if a retail consumer is involved, the consumer has priority to recover from the bond. The amount of the bond must be fifty thousand dollars for a motor vehicle dealer applicant, used motor vehicle dealer applicant, wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer applicant, business disposal applicant, or wholesaler applicant; except that the amount of the bond must be five thousand dollars for those dealers who sell only small utility trailers that weigh less than two thousand pounds. The aggregate liability of the surety for all transactions is limited to the amount of the bond, regardless of the number of claims or claimants.

No corporate surety shall be required to make any payment to any person claiming under the bond until a final determination of fraud has been made by the board or by a court of competent jurisdiction.

All bonds required pursuant to this section shall be renewed annually at such time as the bondholder's license is renewed. The renewal may be done through a continuation certificate issued by the surety.

Nothing in this part 1 shall interfere with the authority of the courts to administer and conduct an interpleader action for claims against a licensee's bond.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 58, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(1) and (2)(a) amended, (SB 19-249), ch. 309, p. 2803, § 4, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 20-140), ch. 225, p. 1102, § 1, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-111 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-113. Motor vehicle salesperson's bond.

Before a motor vehicle salesperson's license is issued by the board through the executive director to any applicant, the applicant must procure and file with the board evidence of a savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101 or a good and sufficient bond in the amount of fifteen thousand dollars with corporate surety duly licensed to do business within the state, approved as to form by the attorney general of the state, and conditioned that the applicant must perform in good faith as a motor vehicle salesperson without fraud and without the violation of any provision of this part 1 related to fraud that is designated by the board by rule. A motor vehicle salesperson need not furnish an additional bond, savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit under this section if the dealer furnishes a bond, savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit under section 44-20-413.

No corporate surety shall be required to make any payment to any person claiming under the bond until a final determination of fraud has been made by the board or by a court of competent jurisdiction.

All bonds required pursuant to this section shall be renewed annually at such time as the bondholder's license is renewed. The renewal may be done through a continuation certificate issued by the surety.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 59, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 20-140), ch. 225, p. 1103, § 2, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-112 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-114. Buyer agent bonds.

To be issued a buyer agent's license, an applicant must procure and file with the executive director evidence of a savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101 or a good and sufficient bond in the amount of five thousand dollars with a corporate surety duly licensed to do business within the state and approved as to form by the attorney general. The bond shall be available to ensure that the applicant shall perform in good faith as a buyer agent without fraud and without violating any provision of this part 1 related to fraud that is designated by the executive director by rule.

All bonds required pursuant to this section shall be renewed annually at such time as the bondholder's license is renewed. The renewal may be done through a continuation certificate issued by the surety.

No corporate surety shall be required to make any payment to any person claiming under the bond until a final determination of fraud has been made by the executive director or by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 59, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

(1) and (3) amended, (SB 20-140), ch. 225, p. 1103, § 3, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-112.2 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-115. Notice of claims honored against bond.

A corporate surety that has provided a bond to a licensee pursuant to section 44-20-112, 44-20-113, or 44-20-114 shall provide notice to the board and executive director of any claim that is honored against the bond within thirty days after the claim is honored.

A notice provided by a corporate surety pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must be in the form required by the director, subject to approval by the board, and must include the name of the licensee, the name and address of the claimant, the amount of the honored claim, and the nature of the claim against the licensee.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 60, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-112.7 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-116. Testing licensees.

Persons applying for a motor vehicle dealer's, used motor vehicle dealer's, wholesaler's, wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer's, or motor vehicle salesperson's license under this part 1 shall be examined for their knowledge of the motor vehicle laws of the state of Colorado and the rules promulgated pursuant to this part 1. If the applicant is a corporation, the managing officer shall take the examination, and, if the applicant is a partnership, all the general partners shall take the examination. No license shall be issued except upon successful passing of the examination. The board shall implement by January 1, 2008, a psychometrically valid and reliable salesperson examination that measures the minimum level of competence necessary to practice. This section shall not apply to a powersports vehicle dealer, used powersports vehicle dealer, or powersports salesperson licensed pursuant to part 4 of this article 20.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 60, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-113 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-117. Filing of written warranties.

Each licensed manufacturer shall file with the director all written warranties and changes in written warranties that the manufacturer makes on any motor vehicle or parts thereof. Each licensed manufacturer shall file with the director a copy of the delivery and preparation obligations of its dealers. These warranties and obligations constitute the dealer's only responsibility for product liability as between the dealer and the manufacturer.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 60, § 2, effective October 1; entire section amended, (SB 18-219), ch. 330, p. 1974, § 1, effective October 1.

44-20-118. Application - prelicensing education - fingerprint-based criminal history record check - rules.

Application for a motor vehicle dealer's, motor vehicle salesperson's, used motor vehicle dealer's, wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer's, wholesaler's, or business disposal license must be made to the board.

Application for distributor's, manufacturer representative's, or manufacturer's licenses shall be made to the executive director.

All fees for licenses shall be paid at the time of the filing of the application for the license.

To be licensed as a motor vehicle dealer, a person must file with the board a certified copy of a certificate of appointment as a dealer from a manufacturer.

Each person applying for a manufacturer's or distributor's license must:

File with the director a certified copy of a typical sales, service, and parts agreement with all motor vehicle dealers; and

File evidence of the appointment of an agent for process in the state of Colorado.

Within sixty days after amending, modifying, or adding an addendum to the sales, service, or parts agreement of more than one motor vehicle dealer, a licensed manufacturer or distributor shall file a certified copy of the new sales, service, and parts agreement, including the changes, with the director if the amendment, modification, or addendum materially alters the rights and obligations of the contracting parties.

All persons applying for a motor vehicle dealer's license, a used motor vehicle dealer's license, a wholesaler's license, a motor vehicle auctioneer's license, a motor vehicle salesperson's license, or a business disposal license must file with the board a good and sufficient instrument in writing in which the applicant appoints the secretary of the board as the true and lawful agent of the applicant upon whom all process may be served in any action commenced against the applicant arising out of any claim for damages suffered by a person by reason of a violation by the applicant of this part 1 or any condition of the applicant's bond.

A person applying for a used motor vehicle dealer's license, a wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer's license, or a wholesaler's license shall file with the board a certification that the applicant has met the educational requirements for licensure under this subsection (7). This subsection (7) shall not apply to a person who has held a license within the last three years as a motor vehicle dealer, used motor vehicle dealer, wholesaler, wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer, powersports vehicle dealer, or used powersports vehicle dealer under this part 1 or part 4 of this article 20.

An applicant for a used motor vehicle dealer's license, a wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer's license, or a wholesaler's license shall not be licensed unless one of the following persons has completed an eight-hour prelicensing education program:

The managing officer if the applicant is a corporation or limited liability company;

All of the general partners if the applicant is any form of partnership; or

The owner or managing officer if the applicant is a sole proprietorship.

The prelicensing education program shall include, without limitation, state and federal statutes and rules governing the sale of motor vehicles.

A prelicensing education program shall not fulfill the requirements of this section unless approved by the board. The board shall approve any program with a curriculum that reasonably covers the material required by this section within eight hours.

The board may adopt rules establishing reasonable fees to be charged for the prelicensing education program.

The board may adopt reasonable rules to implement this section, including, without limitation, rules that govern:

The content and subject matter of education;

The criteria, standards, and procedures for the approval of courses and course instructors;

The training facility requirements; and

The methods of instruction.

An approved prelicensing program provider shall issue a certificate to a person who successfully completes the approved prelicensing education program. The current certificate of completion, or a copy of the certificate, shall be posted conspicuously at the dealership's principal place of business.

An approved prelicensing program provider shall submit a certificate to the director for each person who successfully completes the prelicensing education program. The certificate may be transmitted electronically.

With the submission of an application for any license issued under this part 1, each applicant shall submit a complete set of fingerprints to the Colorado bureau of investigation or the auto industry division for the purpose of conducting fingerprint-based criminal history record checks. The Colorado bureau of investigation shall forward the fingerprints to the federal bureau of investigation for the purpose of conducting fingerprint-based criminal history record checks. The board or the executive director shall use the information resulting from the fingerprint-based criminal history record check to investigate and determine whether an applicant is qualified to be licensed. The board or the executive director may verify the information an applicant is required to submit. The applicant shall pay the costs associated with the fingerprint-based criminal history record check to the Colorado bureau of investigation.

When the results of a fingerprint-based criminal history record check of an applicant performed pursuant to this subsection (8) reveal a record of arrest without a disposition, the department shall require that applicant to submit to a name-based judicial record check, as defined in section 22-2-119.3 (6)(d).

This subsection (8) does not apply to a publicly traded company or the company's subsidiary.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 60, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(8)(a.5) added, (HB 19-1166), ch. 125, p. 563, § 62, effective April 18; (1) and (6) amended, (SB 19-249), ch. 309, p. 2803, § 5, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

(8)(a.5) amended, (HB 22-1270), ch. 114, p. 535, § 58, effective April 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-115 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-119. Notice of change of address or status.

The board, through the executive director, shall not issue a motor vehicle dealer's license or used motor vehicle dealer's license to any applicant therefor who has no principal place of business as is defined in this part 1. Should the motor vehicle dealer or used motor vehicle dealer change the site or location of the dealer's principal place of business, the dealer shall immediately upon making the change so notify the board in writing, and thereupon a new license shall be granted for the unexpired portion of the term of the license at a fee established pursuant to section 44-20-111. Should a motor vehicle dealer or used motor vehicle dealer, for any reason whatsoever, cease to possess a principal place of business, as defined in this part 1, from and on which the dealer conducts the business for which the dealer is licensed, the dealer shall immediately so notify in writing the board and, upon demand therefor by the board, shall deliver to it the dealer's license, which shall be held and retained until it appears to the board that the licensee again possesses a principal place of business; whereupon, the dealer's license shall be reissued. Nothing in this part 1 shall be construed to prevent a motor vehicle dealer or used motor vehicle dealer from conducting the business for which the dealer is licensed at one or more sites or locations not contiguous to the dealer's principal place of business but operated and maintained in conjunction therewith.

If a motor vehicle dealer changes to a new line-make of motor vehicles, adds another franchise for the sale of new motor vehicles, or cancels or, for any cause whatever, otherwise loses a franchise for the sale of new motor vehicles, the dealer shall immediately so notify the board. In the case of a cancellation or loss of franchise, the board shall determine whether the dealer who lost the franchise should be licensed as a used motor vehicle dealer.

If the motor vehicle dealer no longer possesses a franchise to sell new motor vehicles, the board shall take up, and the motor vehicle dealer shall deliver to the board, the dealer's license, and the board shall direct the director to issue the dealer a used motor vehicle dealer's license.

Upon the cancellation or loss of a franchise to sell new motor vehicles and the relicensing of a dealer as a used motor vehicle dealer, the dealer may continue in the business of a motor vehicle dealer for a time, not exceeding six months after the date of the relicensing of the dealer, to enable the dealer to dispose of the stock of new motor vehicles on hand at the time of relicensing, but not otherwise.

If a motor vehicle salesperson is discharged, leaves an employer, or changes a place of employment, the motor vehicle dealer or used motor vehicle dealer who last employed the salesperson shall confiscate and return the salesperson's license to the board. Upon being reemployed as a motor vehicle salesperson, the motor vehicle salesperson shall notify the board. Upon receiving the notification, the board shall issue a new license for the unexpired portion of the returned license after collecting a fee set pursuant to section 44-20-111 (5). It shall be unlawful for the salesperson to act as a motor vehicle salesperson until a new license is procured.

Should a wholesaler, for any reason whatsoever, change the wholesaler's place of business or business address during any license year, the wholesaler shall immediately so notify the board.

Any wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer who changes a place of business or business address during any license year shall notify the board immediately of the dealer's new business address.

Except as specified in subsection (6)(d) of this section:

A person holding an ownership interest in a licensed corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or other business entity shall not sell the interest to a person who does not already own an interest in the business entity until the owner applies to the board to be approved to hold an ownership interest in the business entity and the board approves the person to hold the interest.

A licensed corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or other business entity shall notify the board within ten days after a transfer, other than a sale, of any ownership that results in a new person holding an interest in the business entity. To continue to hold ownership in the business, the transferee shall apply to the board for approval to continue holding an ownership interest in the business entity.

To be approved by the board to hold an ownership interest in a licensed business entity, the new owner must demonstrate the qualifications necessary for licensing, including a fingerprint-based criminal history record check, in accordance with this part 1.

If the board does not approve a person to hold an ownership interest in a licensed business entity, the person shall transfer the interest within six months after acquiring the ownership interest.

This subsection (6)(c) does not authorize a person to hold an interest in a licensed business entity when the person acquired the interest as the result of a sale that violates subsection (6)(a)(I) of this section.

This subsection (6) does not apply to the sale or transfer of an interest in a publicly traded company.

This subsection (6) does not apply to the sale of an interest to an institutional investor of a business entity that is subject to the reporting requirements of the "Securities Exchange Act of 1934", 15 U.S.C. sec. 78a et seq., as amended. For the purposes of this subsection (6)(d)(II), "institutional investor" means an entity, such as a pension fund, endowment fund, insurance company, commercial bank, or mutual fund, that invests money on behalf of its members or clients and that is required by the United States securities and exchange commission to file a form 13F, or its successor form, to report quarterly holdings.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 63, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-116 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-120. Principal place of business - requirements.

The building or structure required to be located on a principal place of business shall have electrical service and adequate sanitary facilities.

In no event shall a room in a hotel, rooming house, or apartment house building or a part of any single or multiple unit dwelling house be considered a "principal place of business" within the terms and provisions of this part 1, unless the entire ground floor of the hotel, apartment house, or rooming house building or the dwelling house is devoted principally to and occupied for commercial purposes and the office of the dealer is located on the ground floor thereof.

A motor vehicle dealer who operates the motor vehicle dealer's business from his or her primary residence and who has been a resident of Colorado for the immediately preceding twelve-month period and is a motor vehicle dealer only because the dealer sells custom trailers for one or more manufacturers and maintains an inventory of fewer than four vehicles at all times shall be exempt from subsection (2)(a) of this section. Any motor vehicle dealer who is issued dealer plates in accordance with this subsection (2)(b) and section 42-3-116 shall only use the plates on trailers.

It is not a violation of this part 1 or any rule promulgated under this part 1 for a motor vehicle dealer or used motor vehicle dealer to:

Deliver a motor vehicle to a customer for a test drive at a location that is away from the dealer's principal place of business;

Deliver documents for a customer to sign at a location that is away from the dealer's principal place of business;

Deliver documents to, or obtain documents from, a customer at a location that is away from the dealer's principal place of business; or

Deliver a motor vehicle to a customer at a location that is away from the dealer's principal place of business.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to exempt a motor vehicle dealer from local zoning ordinances.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 64, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

(2)(c) added, (SB 22-223), ch. 406, p. 2880, § 1, effective August 10.